Massachusetts, session 194th, S2124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4A the
following new section:-
Section 4B. Behavioral science insights policy directive.
(a) Administrative agencies, independent agencies, and judicial administration are
encouraged to do all of the following:
(1) identify policies, programs, and operations where applying behavioral science insights
may yield substantial improvements in public welfare, program outcomes, and program cost
effectiveness;
of 3

(2) develop strategies for applying behavioral science insights to programs and, where
possible, rigorously test and evaluate the impact of these insights; and
(3) strengthen governmental relationships with the research community to better use
empirical findings from the behavioral sciences.
(b) In implementing the policy directives in subsection (a), agencies and administrators
shall do all of the following:
(1) identify opportunities to help qualifying individuals, families, communities, and
businesses access public programs and benefits by, as appropriate, streamlining processes that
may otherwise limit or delay participation -- for example, removing administrative hurdles,
shortening wait times, and simplifying forms;
(2) improve how information is presented to consumers, borrowers, program
beneficiaries, and other individuals, whether as directly conveyed by the agency, or in setting
standards for the presentation of information, by considering how the content, format, timing,
and medium by which information is conveyed affects comprehension and action by individuals,
as appropriate;
(3) identify programs that offer choices and carefully consider how the presentation and
structure of those choices, including the order, number, and arrangement of options, can most
effectively promote public welfare, as appropriate, giving particular consideration to the
selection and setting of default options; and
(4) review elements of their policies and programs that are designed to encourage or
make it easier for individuals to take specific actions, such as saving for retirement, resolving
of 3

legal issues, or completing education programs. In doing so, agencies shall consider how the
timing, frequency, presentation, and labeling of benefits, taxes, subsidies, and other incentives
can more effectively and efficiently promote those actions, as appropriate. Particular attention
should be paid to opportunities to use nonfinancial incentives.
(c) For policies with a regulatory component, agencies are encouraged to combine this
behavioral science insights policy directive with their ongoing review of existing significant
regulations to identify and reduce regulatory burdens, as appropriate and consistent with Access
to Justice Commission recommendations and the Best Practices for Administrative Agencies to
Enhance Administrative Justice.
(d) Agencies shall engage outside researchers to provide advice and policy guidance to
assist in developing policy objectives and rigorous evaluation of initiatives under this statute, as
appropriate. Criteria for researchers shall include an emphasis on rigorous, evidence-based
evaluation, including but not limited to randomized control trials, and expertise in behavioral
science and related disciplines.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or otherwise affect the authority
granted by law to any government entity.
of 3